South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1049.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The South Carolina State House Committee charged with the responsibility of reviewing and approving all alterations or renovations of the State House or its grounds pursuant to Section 10-1-40 of the S.C. Code is hereby directed to modify the South Carolina Armed Forces Monument erected on the State House grounds, so as to include the United States Space Force with the other branches of the armed forces. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----